Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-316 Fraudulent transfer after
petition. (a) After a petition for rehabilitation or liquidation has been
filed, a transfer of any of the real property of the insurer made to a person
acting in good faith shall be valid against the receiver if made for a present
fair equivalent value, or, if not made for a present fair equivalent value,
then to the extent of the present consideration actually paid therefor, for
which amount the transferee shall have a lien on the property so transferred.
The commencement of a proceeding in rehabilitation or liquidation shall be
constructive notice upon the recording of a copy of the petition for or order
of rehabilitation or liquidation with the bureau of conveyances. The exercise
by a court of the United States or any state or jurisdiction to authorize or
effect a judicial sale of real property of the insurer within any county in any
state shall not be impaired by the pendency of such a proceeding unless the
copy is recorded in the county prior to the consummation of the judicial sale.

(b) After a petition for rehabilitation or
liquidation has been filed, and before either the receiver takes possession of
the property of the insurer or an order of rehabilitation or liquidation is
granted:

(1) A transfer of any of the property of the insurer,
other than real property, made to a person acting in good faith shall be valid
against the receiver if made for a present fair equivalent value, or, if not
made for a present fair equivalent value, then to the extent of the present
consideration actually paid therefor, for which amount the transferee shall
have a lien on the property so transferred.

(2) A person indebted to the insurer or holding
property of the insurer may, if acting in good faith, pay the indebtedness or deliver
the property, or any part thereof, to the insurer or upon the receiver's order,
with the same effect as if the petition were not pending.

(3) A person having actual knowledge of the pending
rehabilitation or liquidation shall be deemed not to act in good faith.

(4) A person asserting the validity of a transfer
under this section shall have the burden of proof. Except as elsewhere
provided in this section, no transfer by or on behalf of the insurer after the
date of the petition for liquidation by any person other than the liquidator
shall be valid against the liquidator.

(c) Nothing in this article shall impair the
negotiability of currency or negotiable instruments. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next